Wyoming, session 2025, HB0165.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 22-2-117(a) and 22-6-120(a)(xii) are
amended to read:
22-2-117. Vote required for election; ratification.
(a) Partisan and nonpartisan candidates who receive
the largest number of votes for each office to be filled at
the general election are elected. Nothing in this election
code shall be deemed to authorize any election in Wyoming
to be conducted through ranked choice voting. Any existing
or future ordinance enacted or adopted by a county,
municipality or any other governmental entity that purports
to authorize ranked choice voting in violation of this
subsection is void. As used in this subsection, "ranked
choice voting" means a voting method that allows voters to
rank candidates for an office in order of preference and
has ballots cast to be tabulated in multiple rounds
following the elimination of a candidate until the
candidate or candidates with the most votes are declared
winners, or any other system that allows a voter to vote
for more than the number of candidates permitted to fill a
particular office.
22-6-120. Format of general election ballot.
(a) The general election ballot shall be printed in
substantial compliance with this format:
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0165
ENROLLED ACT NO. 71, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(xii) Adjacent to the description of any office
shall be printed "Vote for one" or if the office is to be
filled by more than one (1) candidate shall be printed
"Vote For Not More Than", then the appropriate words and
figures designating the proper number to be elected;
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2